Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB657.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, the "Honor and Remember flag" means either:
(a) The Honor and Remember flag as created by Honor and Remember, Inc.;
or
(b) The flag designated by the United States Congress as the official symbol to
honor and remember members of the United States Armed Forces who have
given their lives in the line of duty.
(2) The Honor and Remember flag is designated as the state's emblem of the service
and sacrifice of the brave men and women of the United States Armed Forces
who have given their lives in the line of duty.
(3) The flag may be displayed:
(a) At the following locations:
1. Any state-owned building at which the United States flag is displayed;
2. Any state-owned military memorial;
3. Any other state-owned location; and
4. Any local government building or location at which the United States
flag is displayed or that the local government deems appropriate;
(b) On the following days:
1. Armed Forces Day;
2. Memorial Day;
3. Flag Day;
4. Independence Day;
5. National POW-MIA Recognition Day, the third Friday in September;
6. Veterans Day;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 8:35 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1534
7. Gold Star Mother's Day, the last Sunday in September; and
8. A day, or the anniversary of a day, on which a member of the United
States Armed Forces who is a resident of the state loses his or her life
in the line of duty;
(c) In a manner designed to ensure visibility to the public; and
(d) With no more than two (2) additional flags when displayed together on a
flagpole.
(4) The Honor and Remember flag shall be manufactured in the United States.
(5) A department or agency responsible for a location specified in subsection (3)(a)1.
to 3. of this section, or a local government pursuant to subsection (3)(a)4. of this
section, may promulgate administrative regulations or ordinances, respectively,
as necessary to effectuate this section but shall not require an employee to report
to work solely to display the flag.
(6) If the United States Congress designates a flag as the official symbol to honor
and remember members of the United States Armed Forces who died in the line
of duty, the flag designated by Congress instead of the flag created by Honor and
Remember, Inc., shall be flown in accordance with this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 8:35 AM Jacketed